lib/D-Type/files/hyphendict/en.hyp
.obliga1to
.obligato1ry
.ph8i8l9a8n9t8h8r8o8p8ic.
.ph4il2
.phi1la
.phila2n
.philan1t
.philant4hr4
.philanthrop3ic
.pr8e8s8e8nt.
.p3re1s2e
.presen1t
.pr8e8s8e8n8ts.
.presen4t4s2
.pr8o8j8e8ct.
.pro5j
.pro1je
.proje2c1t
.pr8o8j8e8c8ts.
.projec4t1s2
.re8c8i9p8r8o8c8i8ty.
.re1c2i
.rec2ip
.recipr2
.recipr2oc
.recipro1ci
.recipro2c1it
.reciproci1ty
.re9c8o8g9n8i9z8a8n8ce.
.re1co
.re2cog
.rec3ogniz
.recog1ni
.recogniza1
.recogniza2n
.re8f9o8r9m8a9t8i8on.
.re1f
.re1fo
.refo2r
.refor1m
.refor1ma
.reforma1t2io
.reformatio2n
.re8t9r8i9b8u9t8i8on.
.re3tri
.retr4ib
.retri3bu1t2io
.retrib4u1t2i
.retributio2n
.ta9b8le.
.2tab
.tab2l2
